Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-3907
Operator, owner, or lessee; post
warning sign; information.

(1) An operator, an owner of a tanning facility, or a lessee
of a tanning facility shall post a warning sign in a conspicuous location
in the tanning facility where it is readily visible by any person entering
the tanning facility. The warning sign shall have black letters which are
at least one-fourth inch in height.

(2) The warning
sign shall include the following information:

DANGER — Ultraviolet Radiation

Follow instructions.

Avoid overexposure.
As with natural sunlight, overexposure can cause eye and skin injuries and
allergic reactions. Repeated exposure may cause premature aging of the skin
and skin cancer.

WEAR PROTECTIVE EYEWEAR — Failure to do so may result in severe
burns or long-term injury to eyes.

Medicines or cosmetics can increase your
sensitivity to ultraviolet radiation. Consult your physician before using
sunlamps if you are using medication or have a history of skin problems or
believe yourself to be especially sensitive to sunlight. If you do not tan
in the sun, you are unlikely to tan from the use of tanning equipment.

It is
unlawful for a tanning facility to allow a person under sixteen years of age
to use tanning equipment without being accompanied by the person's parent
or legal guardian.

Any person may report a violation of the Indoor Tanning Facility
Act to the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 7.